Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3526
Radiation Transportation Emergency Response Cash Fund; created; use; investment; changes in fees; when.

The Radiation Transportation Emergency Response Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of fees credited pursuant to section 71-3525. The fund shall be used for the purposes stated in such section, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The Director-State Engineer, the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety, the chief executive officer of the department, the Adjutant General as director of the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency, and the executive director of the Public Service Commission, or their designees, shall meet at least annually to recommend changes in the fees charged and allocation of the fees collected among participating agencies based upon their respective costs in carrying out such section. Any money in the Radiation Transportation Emergency Response Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2003, LB 165, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 575;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 163.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.